Maryland, session 2026, HB1600.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
11B–112.
(a) (1) (i) Subject to the provisions of paragraph (2) of this subsection, all
books and records kept by or on behalf of the homeowners association shall be made
available for examination or copying, or both, by a lot owner, a lot owner’s mortgagee, or
their respective duly authorized agents or attorneys, during normal business hours, and
after reasonable notice.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1600*

HOUSE BILL 1600
(ii) Books and records required to be made available under
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph shall first be made available to a lot owner no later than
15 business days after a lot is conveyed by the declarant and the lot owner requests to
examine or copy the books and records.
(iii) If a lot owner requests in writing a copy of financial statements
of the homeowners association or the minutes of a meeting of the governing body of the
homeowners association to be delivered, the governing body of the homeowners association
shall compile and send the requested information by mail, electronic transmission, or
personal delivery:
1. Within 21 days after receipt of the written request, if the
financial statements or minutes were prepared within the 3 years immediately preceding
receipt of the request; or
2. Within 45 days after receipt of the written request, if the
financial statements or minutes were prepared more than 3 years before receipt of the
request.
(2) Books and records kept by or on behalf of a homeowners association
may be withheld from public inspection, except for inspection by the person who is the
subject of the record or the person’s designee or guardian, to the extent that they concern:
(i) Personnel records, not including information on individual
salaries, wages, bonuses, and other compensation paid to employees;
(ii) An individual’s medical records;
(iii) An individual’s personal financial records, including assets,
income, liabilities, net worth, bank balances, financial history or activities, and
creditworthiness;
(iv) Records relating to business transactions that are currently in
negotiation;
(v) The written advice of legal counsel; or
(vi) Minutes of a closed meeting of the governing body of the
homeowners association, unless a majority of a quorum of the governing body of the
homeowners association that held the meeting approves unsealing the minutes or a
recording of the minutes for public inspection.
(3) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH APPLIES ONLY TO A HOMEOWNERS
ASSOCIATION WITH AT LEAST 100 LOTS.

HOUSE BILL 1600 3
(II) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER CREATION OR RECEIPT, AND
SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE FOLLOWING BOOKS AND
OTHER RECORDS KEPT BY OR ON BEHALF OF A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION SHALL
BE POSTED ON THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION’S WEBSITE, ONLINE PORTAL, OR
MOBILE DEVICE APPLICATION:
1. THE DECLARATION AND ANY AMENDMENTS TO THE
DECLARATION;
2. THE BYLAWS AND ANY AMENDMENTS TO THE BYLAWS;
3. THE ARTICLES OF INCORPORATION OF THE
HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION OR OTHER DOCUMENTS CREATING THE HOMEOWNERS
ASSOCIATION AND EACH AMENDMENT TO THE ARTICLES OF INCORPORATION OR
OTHER DOCUMENTS;
4. THE POLICIES, RULES, AND REGULATIONS OF THE
HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION;
5. THE APPROVED MINUTES OF ALL OPEN MEETINGS OF
THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OR GOVERNING BODY OF THE HOMEOWNERS
ASSOCIATION FOR THE PRECEDING 5 YEARS;
6. THE RECORDING OF ALL MEETINGS OF THE
HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION, THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OR GOVERNING BODY, OR
A COMMITTEE OF THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION THAT ARE CONDUCTED BY
TELEPHONE CONFERENCE, VIDEO CONFERENCE, OR SIMILAR ELECTRONIC MEANS
OVER THE PRECEDING 12 MONTHS;
7. ALL WRITTEN INFORMATION PROVIDED TO OR USED
BY THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OR GOVERNING BODY AT ALL OPEN MEETINGS OF THE
BOARD OF DIRECTORS OR GOVERNING BODY OF THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION;
AND
8. ALL BOOKS AND RECORDS KEPT BY OR ON BEHALF OF
THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION THAT MAY BE REASONABLY REQUESTED FOR
POSTING BY A LOT OWNER WHEN THE RECORDS WOULD OTHERWISE BE AVAILABLE
TO THE LOT OWNER UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(III) A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION THAT DOES NOT USE A
WEBSITE, ONLINE PORTAL, OR MOBILE DEVICE APPLICATION SHALL DEVELOP A
WEBSITE, ONLINE PORTAL, OR MOBILE DEVICE APPLICATION THAT IS CAPABLE OF

HOUSE BILL 1600
STORING THE BOOKS AND RECORDS REQUIRED TO BE POSTED UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(IV) THE WEBSITE, ONLINE PORTAL, OR MOBILE DEVICE
APPLICATION DEVELOPED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF THIS PARAGRAPH MUST
BE MADE ACCESSIBLE TO THE LOT OWNERS:
1. FOR A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION ESTABLISHED ON
OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2026, BY OCTOBER 1, 2027; OR
2. FOR A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION ESTABLISHED
AFTER OCTOBER 1, 2026, WITHIN 1 YEAR AFTER THE ELECTION OF A GOVERNING
BODY OF THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION REQUIRED UNDER § 11B–106.1 OF THIS
TITLE.
11B–112.3.
(f) (1) The governing body of a homeowners association shall, in consultation
with a person identified under subsection (e)(1) of this section, develop a funding plan to
determine how to fund the reserves necessary under this section.
(2) In developing the funding plan under this subsection, the governing
body shall select one of the following methods to achieve the reserve funding under this
section:
(i) The component method;
(ii) The cash flow method;
(iii) The baseline funding method;
(iv) The threshold cash flow method; or
(v) Any other funding method consistent with generally accepted
accounting principles.
(3) A funding plan developed under this subsection shall prioritize
adequate amounts for repair and replacement of common areas of the homeowners
association that are necessary for:
(i) The health, safety, and well–being of the occupants;
(ii) Ensuring structural integrity, such as roofing replacements and
maintaining structural systems;

HOUSE BILL 1600 5
(iii) Essential functioning, such as plumbing, sewer, heating, cooling,
and electrical infrastructure; and
(iv) Any other essential or critical purpose, as determined by the
governing body.
(4) Reserves may be used for purposes other than those specified in the
funding plan if the funds are repaid to the reserve fund within 5 years after their use.
(5) A governing body of a homeowners association shall review progress
toward compliance with the funding plan developed under this subsection at each annual
meeting of the homeowners association.
(6) A GOVERNING BODY OF A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION MAY
SECURE A LINE OF CREDIT OR LOAN TO FUND THE RESERVES NECESSARY UNDER
THIS SECTION BY A VOTE OF LOT OWNERS IN GOOD STANDING HAVING AT LEAST 51%
OF THE VOTES IN THE DEVELOPMENT.
11B–113.1.
(a) Notwithstanding language contained in the governing documents of a
homeowners association, the homeowners association [may] SHALL provide notice of a
meeting or deliver information to a lot owner by electronic transmission if:
(1) [The board of directors or other governing body of the homeowners
association gives the homeowners association the authority to provide notice of a meeting
or deliver information by electronic transmission;
(2)] The lot owner gives the homeowners association prior written
authorization to provide notice of a meeting or deliver information by electronic
transmission; and
[(3)] (2) An officer or agent of the homeowners association certifies in
writing that the homeowners association has provided notice of a meeting or delivered
material or information as authorized by the lot owner.
(B) NOTICE OF A MEETING DELIVERED BY ELECTRONIC TRANSMISSION
SHALL BE GIVEN AT LEAST 14 DAYS BEFORE THE MEETING AND INCLUDE:
(1) THE TIME OF THE MEETING;
(2) FOR A MEETING HELD IN PERSON, THE LOCATION OF THE
MEETING; AND

HOUSE BILL 1600
(3) FOR A MEETING HELD VIRTUALLY, INSTRUCTIONS ON HOW A LOT
OWNER MAY PARTICIPATE, INCLUDING A HYPERLINK OR CALL–IN NUMBER.
[(b)] (C) Notice or delivery by electronic transmission shall be considered
ineffective if:
(1) The homeowners association is unable to deliver two consecutive
notices; and
(2) The inability to deliver the electronic transmission becomes known to
the person responsible for sending the electronic transmission.
[(c)] (D) The inadvertent failure to deliver notice by electronic transmission IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION does not invalidate any meeting or other action.
11B–113.2.
(a) (1) Notwithstanding language contained in the governing documents of the
homeowners association, the board of directors or other governing body of the homeowners
association may authorize lot owners to submit a vote or proxy by electronic transmission
if the electronic transmission contains information that verifies that the vote or proxy is
authorized by the lot owner or the lot owner’s proxy.
(2) (I) LOT OWNERS MAY PETITION THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OR
GOVERNING BODY TO HOLD A MEETING TO AMEND THE GOVERNING DOCUMENTS OF
A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION TO AUTHORIZE VOTING BY ELECTRONIC
TRANSMISSION IF AT LEAST 25% OF THE ELIGIBLE VOTING MEMBERS OF THE
HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION SUBMIT A PETITION TO THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OR
GOVERNING BODY.
(II) A PETITION DESCRIBED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH MUST BE SUBMITTED TO THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OR GOVERNING
BODY NOT LATER THAN 180 DAYS AFTER THE NEXT SCHEDULED ANNUAL MEETING.
(III) A MEETING TO AMEND THE GOVERNING DOCUMENTS OF A
HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL:
1. BE HELD NOT LATER THAN 21 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT
OF A PETITION BY THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OR GOVERNING BODY; AND
2. SATISFY APPLICABLE REQUIREMENTS FOR A
MEETING AND VOTE TO AMEND THE GOVERNING DOCUMENTS OF THE HOMEOWNERS
ASSOCIATION.

HOUSE BILL 1600 7
(b) If the governing documents of the homeowners association require voting by
secret ballot and the anonymity of voting by electronic transmission cannot be guaranteed,
voting by electronic transmission shall be permitted if lot owners have the option of casting
anonymous printed ballots.
11B–113.6.
(a) (1) Notwithstanding language contained in the governing documents of the
homeowners association, the governing body may authorize meetings of the homeowners
association, the governing body, or a committee of the homeowners association to be
conducted or attended by telephone conference, video conference, or similar electronic
means.
(2) If a meeting is conducted by telephone conference, video conference, or
similar electronic means, the equipment or system used must permit any lot owner, board
member, or committee member in attendance to hear and be heard by all others
participating in the meeting.
(3) A link or instructions on how to access the meeting by telephone
conference, video conference, or similar electronic means shall be included in the notice of
the meeting.
(4) No specific authorization from lot owners shall be required to hold a
meeting electronically.
(5) A RECORDING OF A MEETING CONDUCTED BY TELEPHONE
CONFERENCE, VIDEO CONFERENCE, OR SIMILAR ELECTRONIC MEANS SHALL BE
KEPT AS AN OFFICIAL RECORD OF THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 11B–112 OF THIS TITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.